Hawaii statutes.
§289-7 Director of finance to maintain
records. The director of finance shall promulgate, pursuant to chapter 91,
the rules and regulations necessary for the carrying out of this chapter and
also prescribe the forms for the applications, licenses, and other documents
mentioned herein, and shall create and maintain in the director of finance's
office an appropriate filing system to accommodate the records required to be
filed with the director of finance by this chapter. [L 1967, c 277, §8; HRS
§289-7; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next